Vermont, session 2025-2026, H213.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 1304 is amended to read:
§ 1304. CRUELTY TO A CHILD; TORTURE OF A CHILD
(a) A person over 16 years of age, having the custody, charge, or care of a
child, who willfully through omission, neglect, or reckless act, assaults, ill
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 2 of 9
treats, neglects, or abandons or exposes such child, or causes or procures such
child to be assaulted, ill-treated, neglected, abandoned, or exposed, in a manner
to cause such child unnecessary physical suffering or emotional distress, or to
endanger his or her the child’s health, shall be imprisoned not more than two
years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(b)(1) A person is guilty of torture of a child when the person knowingly
inflicts serious bodily injury or severe emotional distress, or both, against
another person within the person’s custody, charge, or care.
(2)(A) A person who is convicted of torture shall be imprisoned not
more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
(B) If the child suffers death, or serious bodily injury as defined in
subdivision 1021(2) of this title, or is subjected to sexual conduct as defined in
subdivision 2821(2) of this title, the person shall be imprisoned not more than
ten 10 years or fined not more than $20,000.00, or both.
(3) It shall not be an affirmative defense to a charge under this
subsection that the alleged victim did not suffer pain.
(2)(4) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge under this subsection
(b), if proven by a preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant engaged
in the conduct set forth in subsection (a) of this section because of a reasonable
fear that he or she the person or another person would suffer death, bodily
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 3 of 9
injury, or serious bodily injury as defined in section 1021 of this title, or sexual
assault in violation of chapter 72 of this title.
(c) The provisions of this section do not limit or restrict the prosecution for
other offenses arising out of the same conduct, nor shall it limit or restrict
defenses available under common law.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Emotional distress” has the same meaning as in subdivision
1061(2) of this title.
(2) “Serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as in subdivision
1021(a)(2) of this title.
(3) “Sexual conduct” has the same meaning as in subdivision 2821(2) of
this title.
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 1940 is amended to read:
§ 1940. SPECIAL INVESTIGATIVE UNITS; BOARDS; GRANTS
(a) Pursuant to the authority established under section 1938 of this title, and
in collaboration with law enforcement agencies, investigative agencies,
victims’ advocates, child advocacy centers, and social service providers, the
Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs shall coordinate efforts to
provide access in each region of the State to special investigative units that:
(1) shall investigate:
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 4 of 9
(A) an incident in which a child suffers, by other than accidental
means, serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021; and
(B) potential violations of:
(i) 13 V.S.A. § 2602 (lewd or lascivious conduct with child);
(ii) 13 V.S.A. chapter 60 (human trafficking);
(iii) 13 V.S.A. chapter 64 (sexual exploitation of children);
(iv) 13 V.S.A. chapter 72 (sexual assault); and
(v) 13 V.S.A. § 1379 (sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult); and
(2) may investigate:
(A) an incident in which a child suffers:
(i) bodily injury, by other than accidental means, as defined in 13
V.S.A. § 1021; or
(ii) death;
(B) potential violations of:
(i) 13 V.S.A. § 2601 (lewd and lascivious conduct);
(ii) 13 V.S.A. § 2605 (voyeurism); and
(iii) 13 V.S.A. § 1304 (cruelty to a child); and
(3) may assist with the investigation of other incidents, including
incidents involving domestic violence and crimes against vulnerable adults.
* * *
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 5 of 9
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 4915 is amended to read:
§ 4915. ASSESSMENT AND INVESTIGATION
(a) Upon receipt of a report of abuse or neglect, the Department shall
promptly determine whether it constitutes an allegation of child abuse or
neglect as defined in section 4912 of this title. The Department shall respond
to reports of alleged neglect or abuse that occurred in Vermont and to out-of-
state conduct when the child is a resident of or is present in Vermont.
(b) If the report is accepted as a valid allegation of abuse or neglect, the
Department shall determine whether to conduct an assessment as provided for
in section 4915a of this title or to conduct an investigation as provided for in
section 4915b of this title. The Department shall begin either an assessment or
an investigation within 72 hours after the receipt of a report made pursuant to
section 4914 of this title, provided that it has sufficient information to proceed.
The Commissioner may waive the 72-hour requirement only when necessary
to locate the child who is the subject of the allegation or to ensure the safety of
the child or social worker.
(c) The decision to conduct an assessment shall include consideration of
the following factors:
(1) the nature of the conduct and the extent of the child’s injury, if any;
(2) the accused person’s prior history of child abuse or neglect, or lack
thereof; and
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 6 of 9
(3) the accused person’s willingness or lack thereof to accept
responsibility for the conduct and cooperate in remediation.
(d) The Department shall conduct an investigation when an accepted report
involves allegations indicating substantial child endangerment. For purposes
of this section, “substantial child endangerment” includes conduct by an adult
involving or resulting in sexual abuse, and conduct by a person responsible for
a child’s welfare involving or resulting in abandonment, child fatality,
malicious punishment, or abuse or neglect that causes serious physical injury.
The Department may conduct an investigation of any report.
(e) The Department shall begin an immediate investigation if, at any time
during an assessment, it appears that an investigation is appropriate.
(f) The Department may shall collaborate with child protection, law
enforcement, child advocacy centers, empaneled multidisciplinary teams
pursuant to section 4917 of this title, and other departments and agencies
entities in Vermont and other jurisdictions to evaluate risk to a child and to
determine the service needs of the child and family. The Department may
enter into reciprocal agreements with other jurisdictions to further the purposes
of this subchapter.
(g) The Department shall report to and receive assistance from appropriate
law enforcement in the following circumstances:
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 7 of 9
(1) investigations of child sexual abuse by an alleged perpetrator 10
years of age or older;
(2) investigations of serious physical abuse or neglect requiring
emergency medical care, resulting in death, or likely to result in criminal
charges;
(3) situations potentially dangerous to the child or Department worker;
and
(4) situations where children may have witnessed violence, injury,
coercion, manipulation, or incidents of criminal activity; and
(5) an incident in which a child suffers:
(A) serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021, by other
than accidental means; and
(B) potential violations of:
(i) 13 V.S.A. § 2602 (lewd or lascivious conduct with child);
(ii) 13 V.S.A. chapter 60 (human trafficking);
(iii) 13 V.S.A. chapter 64 (sexual exploitation of children); and
(iv) 13 V.S.A. chapter 72 (sexual assault);
(v) 13 V.S.A. § 1304 (cruelty to a child; torture of a child);
(vi) 13 V.S.A. chapter 19, subchapter 6 (domestic assaults;
offenses committed within presence of a child); or
(vii) 13 V.S.A. § 2601 (lewd and lascivious conduct).
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 8 of 9
(h) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, reports, assessments, or
investigations that are not accepted pursuant to the criteria of this section shall
be shared with local child advocacy centers and a member of the local Special
Investigation Unit to evaluate whether to commence a criminal investigation or
to provide support services for the well-being and safety of any children
involved.
Sec. 4. 33 V.S.A. § 4917 is amended to read:
§ 4917. MULTIDISCIPLINARY TEAMS; EMPANELING
(a) The Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s designee may
impanel a multidisciplinary team or a special investigative multitask force
team, or both, wherever in the State there may be a probable case of child
abuse or neglect that warrants the coordinated use of several professional
services. These teams shall participate and cooperate with the local special
investigation unit in compliance with 13 V.S.A. § 5415 and 24 V.S.A. § 1940.
(b) The Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s designee, in
conjunction with professionals and community agencies, shall appoint
members to the multidisciplinary teams, which may include persons who are
trained and engaged in work relating to child abuse or neglect such as
medicine, mental health, social work, nursing, child care, child advocacy
centers, education, law, or law enforcement. The teams shall include a
representative of the Department of Corrections. Additional persons may be
VT LEG #379816 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.213
2025 Page 9 of 9
appointed when the services of those persons are appropriate to any particular
case.
(c) The empaneling of a multidisciplinary or special investigative multi-
task multitask force team shall be authorized in writing and shall specifically
list the members of the team. This list may be amended from time to time as
needed as determined by the Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s
designee.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379816 v.1